Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.715

Child care partnership employer liaison.

An employer liaison position is established in the department to be colocated with the department of commerce. The employer liaison shall, within appropriated funds:

(1) Staff and assist the child care partnership in the implementation of its duties;

(2) Provide technical assistance to employers regarding child care services, working with and through local resource and referral organizations whenever possible. Such technical assistance shall include at a minimum:

(a) Assessing the child care needs of employees and prospective employees;

(b) Reviewing options available to employers interested in increasing access to child care for their employees;

(c) Developing techniques to permit small businesses to increase access to child care for their employees;

(d) Reviewing methods of evaluating the impact of child care activities on employers; and

(e) Preparing, collecting, and distributing current information for employers on options for increasing involvement in child care; and

(3) Provide assistance to local child care resource and referral organizations to increase their capacity to provide quality technical assistance to employers in their community.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 214; 2006 c 265 s 203; 1989 c 381 s 6. Formerly RCW 43.215.550, 74.13.0902.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Effective date—2006 c 265: See RCW 43.216.902.

Findings—Severability—1989 c 381: See notes following RCW 43.216.660.